Maine, session 132, LD82.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 39-A MRSA §201, sub-§3-A, ¶B, as amended by PL 2023, c. 405, Pt. A,
§143, is further amended by repealing the last blocked paragraph.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 1 - 132LR0039(03)